Nevada, session 83, AB58.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2. NRS 463.0152 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.0152 1. “Game” or “gambling game” means any game
played with cards, dice, equipment or any mechanical or electronic
device or machine for money, property, checks, credit or any
representative of value, including, without limiting the generality of
the foregoing, faro, monte, roulette, keno, bingo, fan-tan, twenty-
one, blackjack, seven-and-a-half, klondike, craps, poker, chuck-a-
luck, wheel of fortune, chemin de fer, baccarat, pai gow, beat the
banker, panguingui, slot machine, any banking or percentage game
or any other game or device approved by the Commission [, upon
the recommendation] or administratively approved by the Chair of
the Board [,] pursuant to [NRS 463.164.] regulations adopted by
the Commission.
2. The term does not include games:
(a) Played with cards in private homes or residences in which no
person makes money for operating the game, except as a player; or
(b) Operated by qualified organizations that are registered by the
Chair pursuant to the provisions of chapter 462 of NRS.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 3. NRS 463.0157 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.0157 1. “Gaming employee” means any employee,
temporary employee or other representative of an operator of a slot
route, the operator of a pari-mutuel system, the operator of an inter-
casino linked system or a manufacturer, distributor or disseminator,
or a gaming establishment licensed to conduct any game, 16 or more
slot machines, a race book, sports pool or pari-mutuel wagering,
whose job duties pertain to the operation, control or outcome of any
gambling game or the access, transport or review of any gaming
revenue, including, without limitation:
(a) Accounting or internal auditing personnel who are directly
involved in any recordkeeping or the examination of records
associated with revenue from gaming;
(b) Table games personnel;
(c) Cage and counting room personnel;
(d) Slot personnel;
(e) Keno personnel;
(f) Race book and sports pool personnel;
(g) Employees of a person required by NRS 464.010 to be
licensed to operate an off-track pari-mutuel system;
(h) Employees of a person required by NRS 463.430 to be
licensed to disseminate information concerning racing and
employees of an affiliate of such a person involved in assisting the
person in carrying out the duties of the person in this State;
(i) [Employees of a person required by paragraph (e) of
subsection 1 of NRS 463.160 to be registered to operate as a cash
access and wagering instrument service provider;
(j)] Employees whose duties are directly involved with the
manufacture, repair, sale or distribution of gaming devices,
associated equipment when the employer is required by NRS
463.650 to be licensed, cashless wagering systems or interactive
gaming systems;
[(k)] (j) Employees of operators of interactive gaming systems
whose duties include the operational or supervisory control of the
systems or the games that are part of the systems;
[(l)] (k) Employees of operators of call centers who perform, or
who supervise the performance of, the function of receiving and
transmitting wagering instructions;
[(m)] (l) Employees who have access to the Board’s system of
records for the purpose of processing the registrations of gaming
employees that a licensee is required to perform pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter and any regulations adopted pursuant
thereto;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
[(n)] (m) Information technology personnel who have
operational or supervisory control over information technology
systems associated with any of the matters related to gaming
described in this subsection;
[(o)] (n) Hosts or other persons empowered to extend credit or
complimentary services related to gaming;
[(p)] (o) Machine mechanics;
[(q)] (p) Odds makers and line setters;
[(r)] (q) Security personnel;
[(s)] (r) Shift or pit bosses;
[(t)] (s) Shills;
[(u)] (t) Supervisors or managers whose duties include the
supervision of employees described in this subsection;
[(v)] (u) Employees of a person required by NRS 463.160 to be
licensed to operate an information service;
[(w)] (v) Club venue employees; and
[(x)] (w) Other persons whose duties are similar to the
classifications set forth in paragraphs (a) to [(w),] (v), inclusive, as
the Commission may from time to time designate by regulation.
2. “Gaming employee” does not include employees whose
duties do not involve gaming activities, persons engaged exclusively
in preparing or serving food or beverages or persons involved
primarily in the resort or hotel functions of a licensed gaming
establishment.
Sec. 4. NRS 463.01642 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.01642 1. “Information service” means a person who sells
and provides information to a licensed sports pool that is used
primarily to aid the placing of wagers on events of any kind.
2. The term includes, without limitation, a person who sells
and provides any:
[1.] (a) Line, point spread or odds;
[2.] (b) Information, advice or consultation considered by a
licensee in establishing or setting any line, point spread or odds; [or
3.] (c) Advice, estimate or prediction regarding the outcome of
an event [.
] ; or
(d) Management, or consultation or instruction in the
management, of risks associated with wagering pools for a race or
sporting event or any other event for which a wager may be
accepted.
3. The term does not include a newspaper or magazine of
general circulation or a television or radio service or broadcast if the
primary purpose of the newspaper, magazine or television or radio
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
service or broadcast is other than to aid the placing of wagers on
events of any kind.
Sec. 5. NRS 463.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.160 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 and
NRS 462.155, 463.172 and 463.1725, it is unlawful for any person,
either as owner, lessee or employee, whether for hire or not, either
solely or in conjunction with others:
(a) To deal, operate, carry on, conduct, maintain or expose for
play in the State of Nevada any gambling game, gaming device, slot
machine, race book or sports pool;
(b) To provide or maintain any information service;
(c) To operate a gaming salon;
(d) To receive, directly or indirectly, any compensation or
reward or any percentage or share of the money or property played,
for keeping, running or carrying on any gambling game, slot
machine, gaming device, race book or sports pool; or
(e) [To operate as a cash access and wagering instrument service
provider; or
(f)] To operate, carry on, conduct, maintain or expose for play in
or from the State of Nevada any interactive gaming system,
 without having first procured, and thereafter maintaining in
effect, all federal, state, county and municipal gaming licenses or
registrations as required by statute, regulation or ordinance or by the
governing board of any unincorporated town.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, it is unlawful
for any person knowingly to permit any gambling game, slot
machine, gaming device, race book or sports pool to be conducted,
operated, dealt or carried on in any house or building or other
premises owned by the person, in whole or in part, by a person who
is not licensed pursuant to this chapter, or that person’s employee.
3. The Commission may, by regulation, authorize a person to
own or lease gaming devices for the limited purpose of display or
use in the person’s private residence without procuring a state
gaming license.
4. For the purposes of this section, the operation of a race book
or sports pool includes making the premises available for any of the
following purposes:
(a) Allowing patrons to establish an account for wagering with
the race book or sports pool;
(b) Accepting wagers from patrons;
(c) Allowing patrons to place wagers;
(d) Paying winning wagers to patrons; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(e) Allowing patrons to withdraw cash from an account for
wagering or to be issued a ticket, receipt, representation of value or
other credit representing a withdrawal from an account for wagering
that can be redeemed for cash,
 whether by a transaction in person at an establishment or through
mechanical means, such as a kiosk or similar device, regardless of
whether that device would otherwise be considered associated
equipment. A separate license must be obtained for each location at
which such an operation is conducted.
Sec. 5.5. NRS 463.161 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.161 1. A license to operate 15 or fewer slot machines at
an establishment in which the operation of slot machines is
incidental to the primary business conducted at the establishment
may only be granted to the operator of the primary business or to a
licensed operator of a slot machine route.
2. In a county whose population is 100,000 or more, a license
to operate 15 or fewer slot machines at an establishment which is
licensed to sell alcoholic beverages at retail by the drink to the
general public may only be granted if the establishment meets the
requirements of this subsection. The establishment must:
(a) Occupy an area comprised of at least 2,500 square feet of
indoor space which is open and available for use by patrons.
(b) Contain a permanent physical bar.
(c) Contain a restaurant which:
(1) Serves food ordered by patrons from tables or booths.
(2) Includes a dining area with seating for at least 25 persons
in a room separate from the on-premise kitchen. For the purposes of
determining the number of seats pursuant to this subparagraph, the
stools at the bar or the seats outside the dining area must not be
counted.
(3) Includes a kitchen which is operated not less than 12
hours each day the establishment is open for business to the public,
or the entire time the establishment is open for business to the public
if it is open for business 12 hours or less each day.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Bar” means a physical structure with a flat horizontal
counter, on one side of which alcoholic beverages are kept and
maintained, where seats may be placed on the side opposite from
where the alcohol is kept, and where the sale and service of
alcoholic beverages are by the drink across such structure.
(b) “Restaurant” means a public place where hot meals are
prepared and served on the premises.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
Sec. 6. NRS 463.164 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.164 1. A licensee shall not offer a game or gambling
game for play unless the game or gambling game has received [a
recommendation] administrative approval from the Chair of the
Board or an approval of the Commission.
2. [The Board may recommend a game or gambling game for
the approval of the Commission, and upon the issuance of any such
recommendation, a licensee may immediately offer the game or
gambling game for play, subject to the final disposition of the
Commission pursuant to subsection 3.
3. Not later than 60 days after the issuance of a
recommendation of the Board pursuant to subsection 2, the
Commission shall render a final disposition relating to the approval
or disapproval of the game or gambling game. If the Commission
does not render a final disposition within such time, the game or
gambling game is deemed to be approved by the Commission.
4.] The Commission shall adopt regulations governing the
administrative approval of games or gambling games.
Sec. 7. NRS 463.677 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.677 1. The Legislature finds that:
(a) Technological advances have evolved which allow licensed
gaming establishments to expose games, including, without
limitation, [system-based and system-supported games,] gaming
devices, interactive gaming, cashless wagering systems or race
books and sports pools, and to be assisted by an interactive gaming
service provider or a service provider, as applicable, who provides
important services to the public with regard to the conduct and
exposure of such games.
(b) To protect and promote the health, safety, morals, good
order and general welfare of the inhabitants of this State, and to
carry out the public policy declared in NRS 463.0129, it is necessary
that the Board and Commission have the ability to:
(1) License interactive gaming service providers;
(2) Register service providers; and
(3) Maintain strict regulation and control of the operation of
such interactive gaming service providers or service providers,
respectively, and all persons and locations associated therewith.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the
Commission may, with the advice and assistance of the Board,
provide by regulation for the:
(a) Licensing of an interactive gaming service provider;
(b) Registration of a service provider; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(c) Operation of such a service provider or interactive gaming
service provider, respectively, and all persons, locations and matters
associated therewith.
3. The regulations pursuant to subsection 2 may include,
without limitation:
(a) Provisions requiring:
(1) The interactive gaming service provider to meet the
qualifications for licensing pursuant to NRS 463.170, in addition to
any other qualifications established by the Commission and to be
licensed regardless of whether the interactive gaming service
provider holds any license.
(2) The service provider to be registered regardless of
whether the service provider holds any license.
(b) Criteria regarding the location from which the interactive
gaming service provider or service provider, respectively, conducts
its operations, including, without limitation, minimum internal and
operational control standards established by the Commission.
(c) Provisions relating to:
(1) The licensing of persons owning or operating an
interactive gaming service provider, and any person having a
significant involvement therewith, as determined by the
Commission.
(2) The registration of persons owning or operating a service
provider, and any persons having a significant involvement
therewith, as determined by the Commission.
(d) A provision that a person owning, operating or having
significant involvement with an interactive gaming service provider
or a service provider, respectively, as determined by the
Commission, may be required by the Commission to be found
suitable to be associated with licensed gaming, including race book
or sports pool operations.
(e) Additional matters which the Commission deems necessary
and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this section and which
are consistent with the public policy of this State pursuant to NRS
463.0129, including that an interactive gaming service provider or a
service provider, respectively, must be liable to the licensee on
whose behalf the services are provided for the interactive gaming
service provider’s or service provider’s proportionate share of the
fees and taxes paid by the licensee.
4. The Commission may not adopt regulations pursuant to this
section until the Commission first determines that interactive
gaming service providers or service providers, respectively, are
secure and reliable, do not pose a threat to the integrity of gaming
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
and are consistent with the public policy of this State pursuant to
NRS 463.0129.
5. Subject to any regulations adopted by the Commission
pursuant to subsection 6, the premises on which an interactive
gaming service provider or a service provider conducts its
operations are subject to the power and authority of the Board and
Commission pursuant to NRS 463.140, as though the premises are
where gaming is conducted and the interactive gaming service
provider or service provider, respectively, is a gaming licensee.
6. The Commission may adopt regulations that define the
scope of the power and authority of the Board and Commission
provided in subsection 5 as it deems appropriate based on the type
and function of a specific interactive gaming service provider or
service provider.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Interactive gaming service provider” means a person who
acts on behalf of an establishment licensed to operate interactive
gaming and:
(1) Manages, administers or controls wagers that are
initiated, received or made on an interactive gaming system;
(2) Manages, administers or controls the games with which
wagers that are initiated, received or made on an interactive gaming
system are associated;
(3) Maintains or operates the software or hardware of an
interactive gaming system; or
(4) Provides products, services, information or assets to an
establishment licensed to operate interactive gaming and receives
therefor a percentage of gaming revenue from the establishment’s
interactive gaming system.
(b) “Service provider” means a person who [:
(1) Is a cash access and wagering instrument service
provider; or
(2) Meets] meets such [other or additional] criteria as the
Commission may establish by regulation.
Sec. 8. NRS 463.750 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.750 1. The Commission shall, with the advice and
assistance of the Board, adopt regulations governing:
(a) The licensing and operation of interactive gaming; and
(b) The registration of service providers to perform any action
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 7 of NRS 463.677.
2. The regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant to this
section must:
(a) Establish the investigation fees for:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
(1) A license to operate interactive gaming;
(2) A license for a manufacturer of interactive gaming
systems;
(3) A license for an interactive gaming service provider to
perform the actions described in paragraph (a) of subsection 7 of
NRS 463.677; and
(4) Registration as a service provider to perform the actions
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 7 of NRS 463.677.
(b) Provide that:
(1) A person must hold a license for a manufacturer of
interactive gaming systems to supply or provide any interactive
gaming system, including, without limitation, any piece of
proprietary software or hardware;
(2) A person must hold a license for an interactive gaming
service provider to perform the actions described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 7 of NRS 463.677; and
(3) A person must be registered as a service provider to
perform the actions described in paragraph (b) of subsection 7 of
NRS 463.677.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsections 6 to 10,
inclusive, set forth standards for the suitability of a person to be:
(1) Licensed as a manufacturer of interactive gaming
systems;
(2) Licensed as an interactive gaming service provider as
described in paragraph (a) of subsection 7 of NRS 463.677 that are
as stringent as the standards for a nonrestricted license; or
(3) Registered as a service provider as described in paragraph
(b) of subsection 7 of NRS 463.677 that are as stringent as the
standards for a nonrestricted license.
(d) Set forth provisions governing:
(1) The initial fee for a license for an interactive gaming
service provider as described in paragraph (a) of subsection 7 of
NRS 463.677.
(2) The initial fee for registration as a service provider as
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 7 of NRS 463.677.
(3) The fee for the renewal of such a license for such an
interactive gaming service provider or registration as a service
provider, as applicable, and any renewal requirements for such a
license or registration, as applicable.
(4) Any portion of the license fee paid by a person
licensed to operate interactive gaming, pursuant to subsection 1 of
NRS 463.770, for which an interactive gaming service provider may
be liable to the person licensed to operate interactive gaming.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(e) Provide that gross revenue received by an establishment
from the operation of interactive gaming is subject to the same
license fee provisions of NRS 463.370 as the games and gaming
devices of the establishment, unless federal law otherwise provides
for a similar fee or tax.
(f) Set forth standards for the location and security of the
computer system and for approval of hardware and software used in
connection with interactive gaming.
(g) Define “interactive gaming system,” “manufacturer of
interactive gaming systems,” “operate interactive gaming” and
“proprietary hardware and software” as the terms are used in this
chapter.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 4 and 5, the
Commission shall not approve a license for an establishment to
operate interactive gaming unless:
(a) In a county whose population is 700,000 or more, the
establishment is a resort hotel that holds a nonrestricted license to
operate games and gaming devices.
(b) In a county whose population is 52,000 or more but less than
700,000, the establishment is a resort hotel that holds a nonrestricted
license to operate games and gaming devices or the establishment:
(1) Holds a nonrestricted license for the operation of games
and gaming devices;
(2) Has more than 120 rooms available for sleeping
accommodations in the same county;
(3) Has at least one bar with permanent seating capacity for
more than 30 patrons that serves alcoholic beverages sold by the
drink for consumption on the premises;
(4) Has at least one restaurant with permanent seating
capacity for more than 60 patrons that is open to the public 24 hours
each day and 7 days each week; and
(5) Has a gaming area that is at least 18,000 square feet in
area with at least 1,600 slot machines, 40 table games, and a [sports]
race book and [race] sports pool.
(c) In all other counties, the establishment is a resort hotel that
holds a nonrestricted license to operate games and gaming devices
or the establishment:
(1) Has held a nonrestricted license for the operation of
games and gaming devices for at least 5 years before the date of its
application for a license to operate interactive gaming;
(2) Meets the definition of group 1 licensee as set forth in the
regulations of the Commission on the date of its application for a
license to operate interactive gaming; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
(3) Operates either:
(I) More than 50 rooms for sleeping accommodations in
connection therewith; or
(II) More than 50 gaming devices in connection
therewith.
4. The Commission may:
(a) Issue a license to operate interactive gaming to an affiliate of
an establishment if:
(1) The establishment satisfies the applicable requirements
set forth in subsection 3;
(2) The affiliate is located in the same county as the
establishment; and
(3) The establishment has held a nonrestricted license for at
least 5 years before the date on which the application is filed; and
(b) Require an affiliate that receives a license pursuant to this
subsection to comply with any applicable provision of this chapter.
5. The Commission may issue a license to operate interactive
gaming to an applicant that meets any qualifications established by
federal law regulating the licensure of interactive gaming.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 7, 8 and 9:
(a) A covered person may not be found suitable for licensure
under this section within 5 years after February 21, 2013;
(b) A covered person may not be found suitable for licensure
under this section unless such covered person expressly submits to
the jurisdiction of the United States and of each state in which
patrons of interactive gaming operated by such covered person after
December 31, 2006, were located, and agrees to waive any statutes
of limitation, equitable remedies or laches that otherwise would
preclude prosecution for a violation of any provision of federal law
or the law of any state in connection with such operation of
interactive gaming after that date;
(c) A person may not be found suitable for licensure under this
section within 5 years after February 21, 2013, if such person uses a
covered asset for the operation of interactive gaming; and
(d) Use of a covered asset is grounds for revocation of an
interactive gaming license, or a finding of suitability, issued under
this section.
7. The Commission, upon recommendation of the Board, may
waive the requirements of subsection 6 if the Commission
determines that:
(a) In the case of a covered person described in paragraphs (a)
and (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 463.014645:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
(1) The covered person did not violate, directly or indirectly,
any provision of federal law or the law of any state in connection
with the ownership and operation of, or provision of services to, an
interactive gaming facility that, after December 31, 2006, operated
interactive gaming involving patrons located in the United States;
and
(2) The assets to be used or that are being used by such
person were not used after that date in violation of any provision of
federal law or the law of any state;
(b) In the case of a covered person described in paragraph (c) of
subsection 1 of NRS 463.014645, the assets that the person will use
in connection with interactive gaming for which the covered person
applies for a finding of suitability were not used after December 31,
2006, in violation of any provision of federal law or the law of any
state; and
(c) In the case of a covered asset, the asset was not used after
December 31, 2006, in violation of any provision of federal law or
the law of any state, and the interactive gaming facility in
connection with which the asset was used was not used after that
date in violation of any provision of federal law or the law of any
state.
8. With respect to a person applying for a waiver pursuant to
subsection 7, the Commission shall afford the person an opportunity
to be heard and present relevant evidence. The Commission shall act
as finder of fact and is entitled to evaluate the credibility of
witnesses and persuasiveness of the evidence. The affirmative votes
of a majority of the whole Commission are required to grant or deny
such waiver. The Board shall make appropriate investigations to
determine any facts or recommendations that it deems necessary or
proper to aid the Commission in making determinations pursuant to
this subsection and subsection 7.
9. The Commission shall make a determination pursuant to
subsections 7 and 8 with respect to a covered person or covered
asset without regard to whether the conduct of the covered person or
the use of the covered asset was ever the subject of a criminal
proceeding for a violation of any provision of federal law or the law
of any state, or whether the person has been prosecuted and the
prosecution terminated in a manner other than with a conviction.
10. It is unlawful for any person, either as owner, lessee or
employee, whether for hire or not, either solely or in conjunction
with others, to operate interactive gaming:
(a) Until the Commission adopts regulations pursuant to this
section; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
(b) Unless the person first procures, and thereafter maintains in
effect, all appropriate licenses as required by the regulations adopted
by the Commission pursuant to this section.
11. A person who violates subsection 10 is guilty of a category
B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison
for a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of
not more than 10 years or by a fine of not more than $50,000, or
both.
Sec. 9. NRS 465.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
465.090 1. It is unlawful for a person to furnish or
disseminate any information in regard to racing or races, from any
point within this state to any point outside the State of Nevada, by
telephone, telegraph, teletype, radio or any signaling device, with
the intention that the information is to be used to induce betting or
wagering on the result of the race or races, or with the intention that
the information is to be used to decide the result of any bet or wager
made upon the race or races.
2. This section does not prohibit:
(a) A newspaper of general circulation from printing and
disseminating news concerning races that are to be run or the results
of races that have been run; or
(b) The furnishing or dissemination of information concerning
wagers made in an off-track pari-mutuel system of wagering
approved by the Nevada Gaming Commission . [; or
(c) Global risk management pursuant to NRS 463.810 and
463.820.]
3. A person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty
of a category B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the
state prison for a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a
maximum term of not more than 6 years, or by a fine of not more
than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
Sec. 10. NRS 465.094 is hereby amended to read as follows:
465.094 The provisions of NRS 465.092 and 465.093 do not
apply to [global risk management pursuant to NRS 463.810 and
463.820 or to] a wager placed by a person for the person’s own
benefit or, without compensation, for the benefit of another that is
accepted or received by, placed with, or sent, transmitted or relayed
to:
1. A race book or sports pool that is licensed pursuant to
chapter 463 of NRS, if the wager is accepted or received within this
State and otherwise complies with all other applicable laws and
regulations concerning wagering;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
2. A person who is licensed to engage in off-track pari-mutuel
wagering pursuant to chapter 464 of NRS, if the wager is accepted
or received within this State and otherwise complies with subsection
3 of NRS 464.020 and all other applicable laws and regulations
concerning wagering;
3. Any other person or establishment that is licensed to engage
in wagering pursuant to title 41 of NRS, if the wager is accepted or
received within this State and otherwise complies with all other
applicable laws and regulations concerning wagering; or
4. Any other person or establishment that is licensed to engage
in wagering in another jurisdiction and is permitted to accept or
receive a wager from patrons within this State under an agreement
entered into by the Governor pursuant to NRS 463.747.
Sec. 11. NRS 463.01395, 463.810 and 463.820 are hereby
repealed.
Sec. 12. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)